Massachusetts, session 194th, H1354.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2OOO of Chapter 29 of the general laws is hereby amended by 
striking the third sentence in the second paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof 
the following:-  
Money from the fund shall be transferred to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, or any 
successor fund, as necessary to provide payments to acute hospitals and community health 
centers for reimbursable health services. No less than the amounts in subsection (b) of section 
189 of chapter 149 of the general laws shall be annually transferred to the Health Safety Net 
Trust Fund. 
SECTION 2. Section 189 of chapter 149 of the general laws is here by amended in 
subsection (b) by striking “$30,000,000” and replacing with “$60,000,000”. 

of 4 11  SECTION 3.  Section 64 of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Resident” the following 
new definition:- 
"Supplemental shortfall assessment'', an amount equal to 50 percent of the annual 
revenue shortfall in the Health Safety Net Trust fund as determined by the executive office 
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 68A. 
SECTION 4. Section 66 of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended in subsection (b) by striking out clause (i) and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
“all amounts paid by hospitals and managed care organizations under sections 67, 68 and 68A;”. 
SECTION 5. Section 66 of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
further amended in subsection (b) by inserting after the words “money transferred”, the 
following:- “by the executive office in accordance with section 68A of this chapter,”. 
SECTION 6. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following new section:- 
Section 68A. Supplemental MCO Assessment to Fund Shortfall 
(a) No later than April 1 of the year preceding the start of the fund fiscal year, the 
executive office shall estimate the projected total reimbursable health services provided by acute 
hospitals and community health centers and emergency bad debt costs, the total funding 
available and any projected shortfall after adjusting for reimbursement payments to hospitals and 
community health centers. If a shortfall in revenue is estimated to exist in any fund fiscal year to 
cover projected costs for reimbursement of health services, the executive office shall allocate 50 

of 4 32 percent of that shortfall amount to managed care organizations subject to an assessment in 
section 68 of Chapter 118E and that are not Medicaid managed care organizations. 
(b) The executive office shall allocate the supplemental shortfall assessment in a manner 
consistent with the methods promulgated by the executive office to determine the managed care 
liability defined in section 68, with the exception that the supplemental shortfall assessment shall 
only be assessed to managed care organizations that are not Medicaid managed care 
organizations. 
(c) The supplemental shortfall assessment shall be paid to the Health Safety Net Trust 
Fund, established in section 66, by managed care organizations subject to the assessment on a 
monthly basis and shall be assessed on all managed care organization services subject to 
assessment. The executive office shall finalize the supplemental surcharge amount for each fund 
fiscal year using best available data no later than 60 days after the fund fiscal year end. 
(d) The secretary of health and human services shall implement the supplemental 
shortfall assessment described in this section and shall promulgate regulations necessary to 
support implementation of said assessment. In promulgating such regulations, the secretary of 
health and human services shall, at a minimum: (i) establish set assessment rates for the 
supplemental shortfall assessment; (ii) establish any necessary reporting requirements for 
managed care organizations; (iii) establish an appropriate mechanism for enforcing each 
managed care organization’s supplemental shortfall assessment liability to the Health Safety Net 
Trust Fund, established in section 66, if a managed care organization rendering managed care 
organization services subject to assessment does not make a scheduled payment to the Health 
Safety Net Trust Fund; (iv) specify an appropriate mechanism for determination and payment of 

of 4 54 a managed care organization’s supplemental shortfall assessment liability to the Health Safety 
Net Trust Fund; (v) identify the managed care organization services subject to the supplemental 
shortfall assessment; (vi) specify an appropriate mechanism for the determination of a managed 
care organization’s liability in cases of merger or transfer of ownership; and (vii) specify an 
appropriate mechanism by which any amounts paid by a managed care organization in excess of 
its supplemental shortfall assessment may be refunded or otherwise credited to the managed care 
organization. 
SECTION 7. Section 69 of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended in subsection (b) by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the 
following:- “If a shortfall in revenue exists in any fund fiscal year to cover projected costs for 
reimbursement of health services, the office shall allocate 50 percent of that shortfall in a manner 
that reflects each hospital's proportional financial requirement for reimbursements from the fund, 
including, but not limited to, the establishment of a graduated reimbursement system and under 
any additional regulations promulgated by the office.”